Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§183D-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

"Aquaculture" means the propagation,
cultivation, or farming of aquatic plants and animals in controlled or selected
environments for research purposes, commercial purposes, or stocking purposes.

"Aquatic life" means any type of
species of mammal, fish, amphibian, reptile, mollusk, crustacean, arthropod,
invertebrate, coral, or other animal that inhabits the freshwater or marine
environment, and includes any part, product, egg, or offspring thereof; or
freshwater or marine plants, including seeds, roots, and other parts thereof.

"Board" means the board of land and
natural resources.

"Department" means the department of
land and natural resources.

"Feral deer" means a deer that has
escaped or been released from domestication and is living in a wild and
unconfined state.

"Game" means birds and mammals
designated by law or by rule for hunting.

"Game birds" means birds designated
by law or by rule for hunting.

"Game mammals" means mammals
designated by law or by rule for hunting.

"Possess" means to place under direct
physical control, restraint, or confinement.

"Predators" means animals destructive
of wildlife by nature of their predatory habits, including mongooses, cats,
dogs, and rats.

"Release" means to free an animal
from effective confinement or restraint.

"Take" means to injure, hunt, shoot,
wound, kill, trap, net, capture, or possess.

"Wild birds" means birds, other than
game birds, living in a wild and undomesticated state, and the young and eggs
of those birds.

"Wildlife" means any nondomesticated
member of the animal kingdom, including game, whether reared in captivity or
not, and includes any part, product, egg, or offspring thereof, except aquatic
life as defined in this section.

"Wild mammals" means mammals, other
than game mammals, living in a wild and undomesticated state, and the young of
those mammals. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4; am L 1986, c 272, §1; am L 2001, c
177, §1; am L 2012, c 144, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next